Utah statutes.
78B-5-809.   Service of process.

Process for a garnishment under Section 78B-5-808 shall be served only upon the auditor of the legal subdivision garnished.  If there is no auditor, then process shall be served on the clerk of the subdivision, agency, or institution.  The answer of the auditor or clerk shall be final and conclusive.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

